District of Columbia statutes.
47-1063

Department of the District of Columbia Veterans of Foreign Wars; lot 0040, square 5167.

Property situated in square 5167, located at 1601 Kenilworth Avenue, N.E., described as lot 0040, owned, occupied, and used by the Department of the District of Columbia Veterans of Foreign Wars, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as this same property continues to be owned and occupied by the Department of the District of Columbia Veterans of Foreign Wars, and not used for commercial purposes, providing for exemption of certain real properties.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-268, § 2(b), 52 DCR 473
For Temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Veterans of Foreign Wars Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-59, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1794).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of the Veterans of Foreign Wars Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-134, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6853).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Veterans of Foreign Wars Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-231, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10725).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Veterans of Foreign Wars Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-520, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 9002).